New Jersey, session 221, S205.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The New Jersey Cybersecurity and Communications Integration Cell, established pursuant to Executive Order No. 178 of 2015 within the New Jersey Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness, the Office of Information Technology, and the New Jersey Big Data Alliance shall coordinate to establish an advanced cyberinfrastructure strategic plan for the State, which shall include, but not be limited to: (1) assessing the States cyberinfrastructure, public and privately-owned, including, high performance computing, data storage systems, advanced instrumentation, data center facilities, visualization environments, the human expertise necessary to operate the cyberinfrastructure, and the software and advanced networks that link these resources together; (2) creating a roadmap for implementing advanced cyberinfrastructure improvements throughout the State, which shall include, but not be limited to the development of a shared data cloud that integrates data infrastructure, hosted data and data analytics, and the development of a high speed network infrastructure. The shared data cloud shall host an open data repository to address big data challenges and catalyze collaborations between academia, industry, and government; (3) recommending implementation strategies and policies for improving the States cyberinfrastructure to promote economic development in this State; (4) identifying the benefits and the essential applications of cyberinfrastructure; (5) recommending workforce development strategies to ensure that the necessary human expertise is in place; (6) identifying the means of using advanced cyberinfrastructure to drive economic development and facilitate the creation of public-private partnerships; and (7) identifying cybersecurity risk mitigation strategies to help ensure public safety and privacy controls are comprehensively integrated into the States cyberinfrastructure. b.    The New Jersey Cybersecurity and Communications Integration Cell, Office of Information Technology, and the New Jersey Big Data Alliance shall submit the advanced cyberinfrastructure strategic plan to the Governor, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), and to the Legislature no later than one year following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.     As used in this section: Big data means high volume information assets, high velocity information assets, high variety information assets, or all three, that require new forms of processing to enable enhanced decision making, insight discovery, and process optimization. The term cyberinfrastructure includes, but is not limited to, data networks, computational facilities, computing resources, large data sets, specialized software applications, information technology usage improvements, and the human expertise necessary to develop and manage such resources. New Jersey Big Data Alliance means the consortium designated as the States advanced cyberinfrastructure consortium pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2014, c.33 (C.52:17C-3.4), and, as of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), consisting of the following institutions and academically oriented organizations: Rutgers, the State University of New Jersey; Princeton University; New Jersey Institute of Technology; Rowan University; The College of New Jersey; Felician University; New Jersey City University; Ramapo College of New Jersey; Rider University; Saint Peters University; Seton Hall University; Stockton University; Kean University; Montclair State University; the Stevens Institute of Technology; William Paterson University of New Jersey; and the nonprofit organization and technology services provider NJEdge. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.